Maryland, session 2025, SB0738.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
20–102.
This title applies only in Frederick County.
20–1001.3.
(a) There is a barbershop beer and wine license.
(b) The Board may issue the license to a holder of a barbershop permit under §
4–501 of the Business Occupations and Professions Article.
(c) The license authorizes the license holder to provide no more than [5] 6.5
ounces of wine by the glass or 12 ounces of beer for on–premises consumption by a
barbershop customer:
– 1 –

Ch. 835 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) when the customer is provided a service described in § 4–101(l) of the
Business Occupations and Professions Article; or
(2) while the customer is attending a fund–raising event at the barbershop
for which the Department of Permits and Inspections, if required, has issued a permit.
(d) The license may not be transferred to another location.
(e) The license holder may provide beer and wine for on–premises consumption
during normal business hours but not later than 9 p.m.
(f) The annual license fee is $100.
20–1002.
(a) There is a beauty salon beer and wine license.
(b) The Board may issue the license to a holder of a beauty salon permit under §
5–501 of the Business Occupations and Professions Article.
(c) The license authorizes the license holder to provide no more than [5] 6.5
ounces of wine by the glass or 12 ounces of beer for on–premises consumption by a beauty
salon customer:
(1) when the customer is provided a cosmetology service described in §
5–101(n)(1) of the Business Occupations and Professions Article; or
(2) while the customer is attending a fund–raising event at the beauty
salon for which the Department of Permits and Inspections, if required, has issued a permit.
(d) The license may not be transferred to another location.
(e) The license holder may provide beer and wine for on–premises consumption
during normal business hours but not later than 9 p.m.
(f) The annual license fee is $100.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –